Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 6. Enforcement.

Sec. 06.60.400.
Cease and desist proceedings.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.030(d)

and (e), if the department finds, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, that a person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order issued under this chapter, the department may publish findings and enter an order requiring the person to cease and desist from committing or causing the violation and any future violation of the same provision or regulation. An order may, in addition to requiring a person to cease and desist from committing or causing a violation, require the person to comply, or to take steps to effect compliance, with a provision or regulation, on terms and conditions and within a time, as the department may specify in the order. An order may require future compliance or steps to result in future compliance, either permanently or for a period of time, as the department may specify.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.030(d)

and (e), if the department determines that the alleged violation or threatened violation is likely to result in significant dissipation or conversion of assets, significant harm to consumers, or substantial harm to the public interest before the completion of cease and desist proceedings, the department may enter a temporary order requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the violation or threatened violation and to take action to prevent the violation or threatened violation and to prevent dissipation or conversion of assets, significant harm to consumers, or substantial harm to the public interest as the department determines appropriate pending completion of the proceedings. A temporary order may be entered only after notice and opportunity for a hearing, unless the department determines that notice and hearing before entry would be impracticable or contrary to the public interest. A temporary order becomes effective on service on the respondent and, unless set aside, limited, or suspended by the department or a court of competent jurisdiction, remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of the cease and desist proceedings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 51 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.405.
Review of temporary cease and desist orders.

At any time after the respondent has been served with a temporary cease and desist order under AS

06.60.400(b)

, the respondent may apply to the department to have the order set aside, limited, or suspended. If the respondent has been served with a temporary cease and desist order entered without a prior hearing, the respondent may, within 10 days after the date on which the order was served, request a hearing on the application, and the office of administrative hearings shall hold a hearing and render a decision on the application under AS

44.64.060

. A respondent served with a temporary cease and desist order entered without a prior hearing may not apply to the court except after hearing and decision by the department on the respondent’s application under this subsection.

The commencement of proceedings under this section does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the department’s order.

In a cease and desist proceeding under this section, the department may issue an order to prohibit, conditionally or unconditionally, permanently or for a period of time the department determines, a person who has violated this chapter from operating as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator if the conduct of that person demonstrates unfitness to operate as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator.

History.

(§ 52 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.410.
Censure, suspension, or bar.

In addition to any other remedy provided under this chapter, the department may, by order after appropriate notice and opportunity for a hearing, censure a person, suspend the license of a person for a period not to exceed 12 months, or bar a person from a position of employment, management, or control of a licensee or registered depository institution if the department finds that

the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest;

the person has knowingly committed or caused a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter; and

the violation has caused material damage to the licensee, to the registered depository institution, or to the public.

When a person who is the subject of a proposed order under this section receives a notice of the department’s intention to issue an order under this section, the person is immediately prohibited from engaging in any activities for which a license is required under this chapter or for which registration is required under AS

06.60.014

.

A person who is suspended or barred under this section is prohibited from participating in a business activity of a licensee or registered depository institution and from engaging in a business activity on the premises where a licensee or registered depository institution is conducting the business of a licensee or registered depository institution. This subsection may not be construed to prohibit a suspended or barred person from having the person’s personal transactions processed by a licensee or registered depository institution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 53 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 17 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a) and (c), inserted “of registered depository institution” in four places; in (a)(3), inserted “, to the registered depository institution” following “licensee”; in (b), inserted “or for which registration is required under AS

06.60.014

”; in (c), deleted “licensee’s” preceding “business”; inserted “of a licensee or registered depository institution” following “business”.

Sec. 06.60.420.
Civil penalty for violations.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.035

, a person who violates a provision of this chapter, or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter, is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each violation.

The remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this chapter are not exclusive and may be sought in combination with other remedies to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 54 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.430.
Additional enforcement provisions, actions, and rights.

The department may treat a licensee as a financial institution under AS 06.01 when applying the enforcement provisions of AS 06.01.

This chapter may not be interpreted to prevent the attorney general or any other person from exercising the rights provided under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

.

If the department determines that a licensee or a person acting on behalf of the licensee is in violation of, or has violated, a provision of this chapter, the department may refer the information to the attorney general and request that the attorney general investigate the violation under AS

45.50.495

. The attorney general may enjoin a violation of this chapter and may seek restitution, rescission, and other relief as allowed by law.

In addition to another investigation allowed under this chapter, the department may conduct other examinations, periodic audits, special audits, investigations, and hearings as may be necessary and proper for the efficient administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 55, 56 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.440.
Definition. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]